Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202571-903
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 71-904 to 71-914.03 shall apply.

Laws 1976, LB 806, § 2;

Laws 1994, LB 498, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 83-1002;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 23;

Laws 2011, LB512, § 6;

Laws 2024, LB1288, § 8;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 104.